North Dakota statutes. TITLE 62.1 Weapons
CHAPTER 62.1-05 Machine Guns, Automatic Rifles, Silencers, Bombs

62.1-05-01.
Possession and sale of machine guns, automatic rifles, silencers, and bombs — Penalty — Forfeiture.

A person may not purchase, sell, have, or possess a machine gun, fully automatic rifle, silencer, or bomb loaded with explosives or poisonous or dangerous gases, or any other federally licensed firearm or dangerous weapon unless that person has complied with the National Firearms Act [26 U.S.C. 5801-5872].

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony. Upon arrest of that person, the firearm or dangerous weapon must be seized. Upon conviction of the person and motion to the court in which the conviction occurred, the firearm or dangerous weapon must be forfeited to the jurisdiction in which the arrest was made. The firearm or dangerous weapon may be sold at public auction, retained for use, or destroyed pursuant to the court’s order. If a qualified local program as defined under section 12.1-32-02.2 has paid a reward for information that resulted in forfeiture of the item and the item has been sold, the jurisdiction shall, after payment of expenses for forfeiture and sale, repay the qualified local program for the reward that it has paid.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 7; 1991, ch. 133, § 3; 2015, ch. 475, § 11, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Penalties for classified offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of regulations governing carrying, possession, or use of tear gas or similar chemical weapons, 30 A.L.R.3d 1416.

Possession of bomb, Molotov cocktail, or similar device as criminal offense, 42 A.L.R.3d 1230.

Application of statute or regulation dealing with registration or carrying of weapons to transient nonresident, 68 A.L.R.3d 1253.

Burden of proof as to lack of license in criminal prosecution for carrying or possession of weapon without license, 69 A.L.R.3d 1054.

Statutory presumption of possession of weapon by occupants of place or vehicle where it was found, 87 A.L.R.3d 949.

62.1-05-02.
Persons exempt from chapter.

This chapter does not apply to:

The authorized agent and a servant of a person who has a license to purchase, sell, have, or possess a machine gun, submachine gun, fully automatic rifle, silencer, or a bomb loaded with explosives or poisonous or dangerous gases.

Any officer or member of a duly authorized military organization while on official duty and using the firearm or dangerous weapon issued to the officer or member by that organization.

A North Dakota law enforcement officer.

Any federal officer authorized by the federal government to have or possess a machine gun, submachine gun, fully automatic rifle, silencer, or bomb loaded with explosives or poisonous or dangerous gases.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 7.

62.1-05-03.
Chief law enforcement officer certification — Certain firearms.

For purposes of this section:

“Certification” means the participation and assent of the chief law enforcement officer necessary under federal law for the approval of the application to transfer or make a firearm. A chief law enforcement officer is not required to make any certification under this section the officer knows to be untrue, but the officer may not refuse to provide certification based on a generalized objection to private persons or entities making, possessing, or receiving firearms or any certain type of firearm the possession of which is not prohibited by law.

“Chief law enforcement officer” means any official, or the designee of the official, the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives, or any successor agency, identified by regulation as eligible to provide any required certification for the making or transfer of a firearm.

“Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in the National Firearms Act [26 U.S.C. § 5845(a)].

When a chief law enforcement officer’s certification is required by federal law or regulation for the transfer or making of a firearm, the chief law enforcement officer, within thirty days of receipt of a request for certification, shall provide the certification if the applicant is not prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm or is not the subject of a proceeding that could result in the applicant being prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm. If the chief law enforcement officer is unable to make a certification as required by this section, the officer shall provide the applicant with a written notification of the denial and the reason for this determination.

In making the certification required by subsection 2, a chief law enforcement officer or designee may require the applicant to provide only the information as is required by federal or state law to identify the applicant and conduct a criminal background check, including a check of the national instant criminal background check system, or to determine the disposition of an arrest or proceeding relevant to the applicant’s eligibility to lawfully possess or receive a firearm. A chief law enforcement officer may not require access to or consent for an inspection of any private premises as a condition of making a certification under this section.

Chief law enforcement officers and their employees who act in good faith are immune from liability arising from any act or omission in making a certification as required by this section.

An applicant whose request for certification is denied may appeal the chief law enforcement officer’s decision to the district court for the county in which the applicant resides in accordance with the procedures provided in section 28-34-01. If the court finds that the applicant is not prohibited by law from receiving or possessing the firearm, or is not the subject of a proceeding that could result in the prohibition, or that there is insufficient evidence to support the chief law enforcement officer’s determination that the officer cannot truthfully make the certification, the court shall order the chief law enforcement officer to issue the certification and award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the applicant.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 478, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.